Maryland, session 2025, SB0542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “Office” means the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs.
(b) The Office shall contract with an independent consultant to complete a study
of the structure and composition of the distribution and retail sector of the alcoholic
beverages industry in the State and to make recommendations on identifying and
eliminating barriers to minority participation in that industry.
(c) The study shall include:
(1) current participation rates and data organized by racial and ethnic
demographics for distributors and retailers;
(2) historical business participation rates and data organized by racial and
ethnic demographics for distributors and retailers;
(3) the names and total numbers organized by racial and ethnic
demographics of the following that are carried by, or do business with, each distributor and
retailer:
(i) brands by name;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0542*

SENATE BILL 542
(ii) brand owners;
(iii) distillers;
(iv) importers;
(v) manufacturers;
(vi) producers;
(vii) winemakers; and
(viii) creators of any product that contains alcohol, but is not
specifically mentioned above;
(4) how the structure of the distribution and retail sector of the Maryland
alcoholic beverages industry compares to similar structures in other licensing states;
(5) how the participation of businesses owned by different demographics in
Maryland compares to the business participation in other states, where available; and
(6) areas that have potential discrimination within the industry that could
warrant remedial action.
(d) The recommendations shall include:
(1) identifying barriers to participation within the distribution and retail
sector tier of the alcoholic beverages industry;
(2) how the State can enhance business participation in the alcoholic
beverages industry; and
(3) other data that may need to be collected or authorized to fully
understand the opportunity of business enterprises to participate in the alcoholic beverages
industry.
(e) The Office shall consult with the Office of the Attorney General, the
Department of Transportation, and the Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission in
developing the solicitation for an independent consultant under this section.
(f) (1) Each holder of a State or local alcoholic beverages license or permit
must cooperate with the Office and the independent consultant in providing the following
information:
(i) services provided by a wholesaler to a supplier or manufacturer
in exchange for distribution rights within the State;

SENATE BILL 542 3
(ii) a list of suppliers that licensed wholesalers distribute on behalf
of;
(iii) lists of brands sold within the State by each retailer, along with
the demographics of the owner;
(iv) lists of brands distributed within the State by each wholesaler,
along with the demographics of the owner;
(v) the percentage of wholesaler revenues for each brand owner
account service; and
(vi) the percentage of retailer revenues for each brand owner.
(2) Each holder of a State or local alcoholic beverages license or permit, or
applicant for a license or permit, shall cooperate with requests from the Office or the
independent consultant and provide the requested information within 75 days after
receiving the request.
(3) The Office of the Comptroller and each local licensing board shall
cooperate with requests from the Office or the independent consultant and provide the
requested information within 75 days after receiving the request.
(g) Information provided in accordance with this section by each holder of a State
or local alcoholic beverages license or permit, or applicant for a license or permit:
(1) shall:
(i) constitute confidential commercial information and confidential
financial information; and
(ii) be treated as confidential by the independent consultant and the
State; and
(2) may be:
(i) used only for purposes authorized under this section; and
(ii) disclosed to the public only in an anonymized or aggregated
format.
(h) On or before December 1, 2026, the Office shall submit the completed report
and recommendations, along with any additional information the Office considers
pertinent, to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly.

SENATE BILL 542
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.